North Carolina, session 2025, HB1160.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Section 9D.3(b) of S.L. 2023-134 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 9D.3.(b) Fees Beginning October 1, 2026, fees for families who are required to
share in the cost of care are established based on ten percent (10%) seven percent (7%) of gross
family income. When care is received at the blended rate, the copayment shall be eighty-three
percent (83%) of the full-time copayment. Copayments for part-time care shall be seventy-five
percent (75%) of the full-time copayment."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Child Development and Early Education, the sum of
twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) in recurring funds beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal
year to reduce parent copayments for subsidized child care in accordance with Section 1 of this
act.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*H1160-v-1*